Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB205.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1519(c) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1519. Determination of incompetency.* * *(c) Recall [or suspension] of operating privilege.--The department shall recall the operating privilege of any person whose incompetency has been established under the provisions of this chapter or who refuses or fails to comply with the requirements of this section. The recall shall be for an indefinite period until that person complies and satisfactory evidence is presented to the department in accordance with 1234567891011121314151617 regulations to establish that such person is competent to drive a motor vehicle. [The department shall suspend the operating privilege of any person who refuses or fails to comply with the requirements of this section until that person does comply and that person's competency to drive is established.] Any person aggrieved by the recall [or suspension] of the operating privilege may appeal in the manner provided in section 1550. The judicial review shall be limited to whether the person is competent to drive in accordance with the provisions of the regulations promulgated under section 1517 (relating to Medical Advisory Board).(d) Vehicle lease termination on incompetency.--For a consumer lease of a motor vehicle subject to regulations of the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau under 12 CFR Ch. X Pt. 1013 (relating to consumer leasing (Regulation M)), entered into after the effective date of this subsection, a lessee requesting early termination of a lease shall not be liable for any penalty or early termination charge provided by the lease if the vehicle lessee's operating privileges have been recalled under this section and no other member of the lessee's household regularly uses the vehicle. A lessee seeking to terminate a lease under this subsection must provide to the lessor a copy of the notice of license recall provided by the department. The lease shall be terminated upon return of the vehicle to the lessor or other person in the manner provided by the lease, including in any amendment or lease assignment or notice.(D) VEHICLE LEASE TERMINATION ON INCOMPETENCY.--FOR A PENNSYLVANIA CONSUMER LEASE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE SUBJECT TO REGULATIONS OF THE CONSUMER FINANCIAL PROTECTION BUREAU UNDER 12 CFR CH. X PT. 1013 (RELATING TO CONSUMER LEASING (REGULATION 20250HB0205PN1868 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 M)), ENTERED INTO ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LESSEE MAY REQUEST EARLY TERMINATION OF A LEASE IF THE VEHICLE LESSEE'S OPERATING PRIVILEGES HAVE BEEN RECALLED UNDER THIS SECTION AND THE LICENSE RECALL IS EFFECTIVE AS OF THE DATE OF THE LESSEE'S REQUEST TO TERMINATE THE LEASE EARLY AND AT THE TIME OF THE LEASED VEHICLE'S RETURN . A LESSEE SEEKING TO TERMINATE A LEASE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MUST PROVIDE TO THE LESSOR A COPY OF THE NOTICE OF LICENSE RECALL PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN 45 DAYS OF THE LICENSE RECALL. THE LESSEE MUST ALSO PROVIDE THE LICENSE RECALL NOTICE TO THE LESSOR PRIOR TO THE GROUNDING OR RETURN OF THE LEASED VEHICLE. THE LEASE SHALL BE TERMINATED UPON RETURN OF THE VEHICLE TO THE LESSOR OR OTHER AUTHORIZED PERSON IN THE MANNER PROVIDED BY THE LEASE AND THE LESSOR SHALL NOT CHARGE A FLAT FEE OR PENALTY FOR TERMINATING THE LEASE PRIOR TO SCHEDULED MATURITY. THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE LESSOR FROM ASSESSING OTHER CHARGES DUE AND OWING AT EARLY TERMINATION SUCH AS EXCESS WEAR AND USE, EXCESS MILEAGE, DISPOSITION FEE, FINES AND TAXES TIED TO THE LEASED VEHICLE AND ALL OTHER AMOUNTS DUE AND UNPAID UNDER THE LEASE AS OF THE DATE OF TERMINATION. THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY IF THE LESSEE IS EITHER IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF THE LEASE AGREEMENT OR THE LEASE HAS A CO-LESSEE WHO SHALL REMAIN SEPARATELY LIABLE UNDER THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE LEASE.Section 2. This act shall apply to PENNSYLVANIA leases for motor vehicles entered into THAT ARE EXECUTED with a lessee with a billing address located in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0205PN1868 - 3 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728